Utah statutes.
53B-18-601.   Program creation -- Location.
(1)  There is created the Strengthening At-Risk Youth and Their Families
Program to be administered through the Utah State University Extension Family
Life and 4-H Programs.
(2)  The program shall be implemented throughout the state through Utah State
University Extension county offices.
